Utah statutes.
72-9-402.   Limitation of time for presenting claims and bringing suit.

(1) A motor carrier shall allow at least:

(a)  90 days for giving notice of claims for any loss, damage, or injury to property;

(b)  four months for the filing of claims; and

(c)  two years for the institution of suits.

(2)  If the loss or injury complained of is due to delay or damage while being loaded or unloaded, or damage in transit caused by carelessness or negligence, a notice of claim or a filing of claim is not required as a condition precedent to recovery.

